North Dakota, session 69, HB1213.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Subdivision m of subsection 2 of section 6-09-49 of the North
Dakota Century Code is amended and reenacted as follows:
m. Critical political subdivision buildings and infrastructure, including correctional
facilities; and
SECTION 2. TRANSFER - STRATEGIC INVESTMENT AND IMPROVEMENTS FUND -
INFRASTRUCTURE REVOLVING LOAN FUND. The office of management and budget shall
transfer $50,000,000 from the strategic investment and improvements fund to the infrastructure
revolving loan fund during the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2027. The
funding transferred pursuant to this section may be used only for loans to political subdivisions
for correctional facilities.
Page No. 1 25.0626.03000